02_Morphology/chv.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%<n%>                ! Имя существительное, Noun
%<pl%>               ! Множественное число, Plural
%<nom%>              ! Именительный падеж, Nominative
%<ins%>              ! Творительный падеж, Instrumental
%<gen%>
%<der_лӑх%>  
%<abl%>                 !тан, that number thing. 



%{A%}                ! Архифонема [а] или [е], Archiphoneme [a] or [e]
%{Ă%}			!Archiphoneme [Ӑ] or 0
%{м%}               !Archiphoneme [m] or 0
%{т%}		!Archiphoneme [т] or [р] in tan morpheme
%{ъ%}		!for loan words 
%{э%}
%{л%}
%{с%}
%{а%}

%>                   ! Граница морфемы, Morpheme boundary

LEXICON Root

Nouns ;

Guesser ;


LEXICON Guesser

🂡%<guess%>:🂡 N ;


LEXICON CASES 
%<nom%>: # ;

%<ins%>:%>п%{A%} # ;

%<gen%>:%>%{Ă%}н #; 

%<abl%>:%>%{т%}%{A%}н #;


LEXICON PLURAL

             CASES ;
%<pl%>:%>се%{м%} CASES ;

LEXICON SUBST 

PLURAL ;

LEXICON DER-N

%<der_лӑх%>:%>л%{Ă%}х SUBST "weight: 1.0" ;

LEXICON N

%<n%>: SUBST ;
%<n%>: DER-N ;
%<n%>: PLURAL ;

LEXICON Nouns

урам:урам N ;     ! "улица", "street"
пахча:пахча N ;   ! "сад", "garden"
хула:хула N ;     ! "город", "city"
канаш:канаш N ;   ! "совет", "council"
тӗс:тӗс N ;       ! "вид", "aspect"
патша:патша N ;   ! "царь", "tsar"
куҫ:куҫ N ;       ! "глаз", "eye"
патшалӑх:патшалӑх N ;      ! "государство", "state"
специалист:специалист%{ъ%} N ; ! "специалист"
DIGITLEX ; 

LEXICON NUM-DIGIT

%<num%>:%- CASES ;

LEXICON LAST-DIGIT

1:1%{э%}%{л%}    NUM-DIGIT ; ! "пӗр" 
2:2%{с%}%{э%}    NUM-DIGIT ; ! "иккӗ" 
3:3%{с%}%{э%}    NUM-DIGIT ; ! "виҫҫӗ" 
4:4%{с%}%{а%}    NUM-DIGIT ; ! "тӑваттӑ" 
5:5%{э%}%{с%}    NUM-DIGIT ; ! "пиллӗк" 
6:6%{с%}%{а%}    NUM-DIGIT ; ! "улттӑ" 
7:7%{с%}%{э%}    NUM-DIGIT ; ! "ҫиччӗ" 
8:8%{а%}%{л%}    NUM-DIGIT ; ! "саккӑр" 
9:9%{а%}%{л%}    NUM-DIGIT ; ! "тӑххӑр" 

LEXICON LOOP

                 LAST-DIGIT ; 
                 DIGITLEX ; 

LEXICON DIGITLEX

%0:%0 LOOP ;
1:1   LOOP ;
2:2   LOOP ;
3:3   LOOP ;
4:4   LOOP ;
5:5   LOOP ;
6:6   LOOP ;
7:7   LOOP ;
8:8   LOOP ;
9:9   LOOP ;
